New Jersey, session 221, S1954.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The board of education of a school district that includes grades nine through 12, or any combination thereof, shall incorporate instruction on bleed control into the health curriculum for students as part of the districts implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Comprehensive Health and Physical Education.  A board of education may select a no-cost, non-certification instructional program to meet this requirement. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately, and shall first be applicable in the first full school year following the date of enactment.